Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 11. Mississippi Home Corporation Act.
§ 43-33-757.
Term of corporate existence; termination.

The corporation and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law, provided that no such law shall take effect so long as the corporation shall have bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision has been made for the payment thereof. Upon termination of the existence of the corporation, all of its rights and properties in excess of its obligations shall pass to and be vested in the state as follows:

All excess monies shall be deposited into the General Fund of the State Treasury; and

All of the property shall be vested in the State Fiscal Management Board, or its successor, unless otherwise provided by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-759.
Mississippi Affordable Housing Development Fund; powers and duties.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Mississippi Affordable Housing Development Fund to be administered as a revolving fund for the provision of affordable housing to very low income, low income, and moderate income persons. The fund shall be used exclusively to support programs created or administered by the Mississippi Home Corporation under the powers granted to it by law. To this fund shall be deposited all loan repayments, penalties, and other fees and charges accruing to the fund, and any appropriations, donations, gifts, grants or loans which may be made thereto; however, no bond funds shall be deposited into the special fund unless authorized by the Legislature. Monies in the fund which are not currently needed for the programs of the Home Corporation shall be invested by the State Treasurer in such securities as are authorized for the investment of funds of the Home Corporation in Section 43-33-717(5)(e). The interest received on any such investment shall be credited to the fund. Monies remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the state General Fund.

The State Fiscal Management Board is authorized and directed to draw warrants upon such funds from time to time upon requisition of the Home Corporation executed by its executive director, and the State Treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to pay such warrants. The Home Corporation shall have continuing authority to expend funds up to the maximum amount received into the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-761.
Construction of Article in conjunction with other Code provisions.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as affecting the continued existence, powers, duties or structure of the housing authorities created and empowered under Sections 43-33-1 through 43-33-69 and Sections 43-33-101 through 43-33-137, Mississippi Code of 1972, or the administration of programs thereunder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-763.
Public official not to derive income from issuance of bonds.

No member of the Legislature, elected official or appointed official, or any partner or associate of any member of the Legislature, elected official or appointed official, shall derive any income from the issuance of any bonds under this article contrary to the provisions of Section 109, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or Article 3, Chapter 4, Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-765.
Construction of Article.

This article being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof. If any section, provision, paragraph, sentence, phrase or word of this article shall be held to be invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this article shall not be affected thereby.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-767.
Authorization to issue general obligation bonds; resolutions; use of earnings.

In addition to the authority granted under this article to issue revenue bonds, the Mississippi Home Corporation is authorized to declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of negotiable general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for the Mississippi Affordable Housing Development Fund established in Section 43-33-759. Upon the adoption of a resolution by the board, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this section, the corporation shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the State Bond Commission. Upon receipt of such resolution or resolutions, the State Bond Commission, in its discretion, shall act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. The amount of bonds issued to fund housing activities authorized by this section shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00) in the aggregate.

Any investment earnings on amounts deposited into the Mississippi Affordable Housing Development Fund shall be used to pay debt service on the general obligation bonds issued under subsection (1) of this section in accordance with proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-769.
Payment of principal and interest; bond specifications.

The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 shall be payable in the manner provided in this section. Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty (20) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-771.
Signature on bonds; interest coupons.

The bonds authorized by Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-773.
Bonds and coupons are negotiable instruments.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-775.
Sale and form of bonds.

The State Bond Commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. The commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds. The commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale, and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to the date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually; however, the first interest payment may be for any period of not more than one (1) year.

Notice of the sale of any such bond shall be published at least one (1) time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and in one or more other newspapers or financial journals with a national circulation, to be selected by the commission.

The commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-777.
Bonds are general obligations of state.

The bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-779.
Disposition of proceeds of sale of bonds.

Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797, the State Bond Commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the Mississippi Affordable Housing Development Fund created in Section 43-33-759. The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the Department of Finance and Administration under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-781.
Issuance of bonds.

The bonds authorized under Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797. Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the commission by a majority of its members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-783.
Validation of bonds; notice.

The bonds authorized under the authority of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-785.
Protection and enforcement of bond holders’ rights.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-787.
Bonds are legal investments and legal securities.

All bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-789.
Bonds and income tax exempt.

Bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-791.
Use of bond proceeds.

The proceeds of the bonds issued under Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 shall be used solely for the purposes herein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-793.
Authorization to issue warrants for payment on bonds.

The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accredit value of, all bonds issued under Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-795.
Progress report; annual fiscal reports.

The Mississippi Home Corporation shall file a report on July 1, 1995, with the Department of Finance and Administration that describes in detail the progress that has been made in implementing the projects authorized by the Mississippi Home Corporation Act. A report for each fiscal year shall be filed annually on July 1 until all funds required for the projects described in the Mississippi Home Corporation Act have been expended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-33-797.
Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 give complete authority; effect on other laws.

The provisions of Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers herein granted, but Sections 43-33-767 through 43-33-797 shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1994.